District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-325.163

Eligibility for grants.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 12, 2010, D.C. Law 18-218, § 4, 57 DCR 5396
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 2082(c), 60 DCR 12472
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9018, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “Director” for “Deputy Mayor” throughout the section; and rewrote (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 2082(c) and 2083 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 2082(c) and 2083 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9018 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9018 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9018 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Short Title

Section 2081 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle I of Title II of the act may be cited as the “Senior Housing Modernization Grant Fund Emergency Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9018 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.